Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-841
Act; intent; preemption of state or local laws or regulations.

It is the intent of the State Lottery Act that all matters related to the operation of the lottery games conducted pursuant to the act shall be governed solely by the act and shall be free from regulation or legislation by all local governments. No other state or local law or regulation providing any penalty, restriction, regulation, or prohibition on the manufacture, transportation, storage, distribution, advertisement, possession, or sale of any tickets or for the operation of any lottery game shall apply to the tickets or lottery games conducted pursuant to the act.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 60.